Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,165
Persons authorized to remove vehicles; cost of removal; lien.

(1) Whenever any peace officer, or any authorized employee of a law enforcement agency who is employed by a political subdivision of the state and specifically empowered by ordinance to act, finds a vehicle standing upon a highway in violation of any of the provisions of the Nebraska Rules of the Road, such individual may remove the vehicle, have such vehicle removed, or require the driver or other person in charge of the vehicle to move such vehicle to a position off the roadway of such highway or from such highway.

(2) The owner or other person lawfully entitled to the possession of any vehicle towed or stored shall be charged with the reasonable cost of towing and storage fees. Any such towing or storage fee shall be a lien upon the vehicle prior to all other claims. Any person towing or storing a vehicle shall be entitled to retain possession of such vehicle until such charges are paid. The lien provided for in this section shall not apply to the contents of any vehicle.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 71;

Laws 1984, LB 482, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 833, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-671;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 261.